Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-625.02
Electric transmission facilities and interconnections, defined; policy of state.

It is declared to be the policy of the State of Nebraska that electric transmission facilities and interconnections which are defined as being electric lines having a rating of thirty-four thousand five hundred volts and higher will be provided and made available to all power agencies so as to result in the lowest possible cost for the transmission and delivery of electric energy over the transmission and interconnected facilities of any public power district, public power and irrigation district, individual municipality, group of municipalities registered with the Nebraska Power Review Board, governmental subdivision, or nonprofit electric cooperative corporation.

Laws 1967, c. 421, § 1, p. 1295;

Laws 1969, c. 550, § 1, p. 2206;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 16.